Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) If a local education agency's combined state revenue generated in the 2026-27 school year is less than what its combined state revenue would be using 2025-26 annual average enrollment values and formulas in place for the 2026-27 school year, then the superintendent of public instruction must provide a 2026-27 enrollment stabilization amount to the local education agency in the 2026-27 school year.(2) If a local education agency's combined state revenue generated in the 2027-28 school year is less than what its combined state revenue would be using 2025-26 annual average enrollment values and formulas in place for the 2027-28 school year, then the superintendent of public instruction must provide a 2027-28 enrollment stabilization amount to the local education agency in the 2027-28 school year.(3) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(a) "2026-27 enrollment stabilization amount" is equal to a local education agency's combined state revenue that would be generated using 2025-26 annual average enrollment values and formulas in place for the 2026-27 school year minus its combined state revenue generated in the 2026-27 school year, if the difference is greater than zero;(b) "2027-28 enrollment stabilization amount" is equal to a local education agency's combined state revenue that would be generated using 2025-26 annual average enrollment values and formulas in place for the 2027-28 school year minus its combined state revenue generated in the 2027-28 school year, if the difference is greater than zero;(c) "Combined state revenue" means the combined amount from the following allocations to local education agencies:(i) General apportionment allocations as described in RCW 28A.150.260;(ii) Special education allocations as described in RCW 28A.150.390;(iii) Learning assistance program allocations as described in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). Learning assistance program allocations based on 2025-26 enrollments must include the prior years' free or reduced-price meal percentages used for allocations in the 2026-27 or 2027-28 school years;(iv) Transitional bilingual program allocations as described in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b);(v) Highly capable program allocations as described in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c);(vi) Career and technical education and skill centers allocations as described in RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(c), (7), and (9);(vii) Allocations to support institutional education for residential schools as defined in RCW 28A.190.005 and of juveniles in detention facilities as identified by RCW 28A.190.010;(viii) Dropout reengagement program allocations for eligible students under RCW 28A.175.100;(ix) Alternative learning experience allocations as described in RCW 28A.232.020; and(x) Running start allocations as described in RCW 28A.600.310; and(d) "Local education agency" means a school district, charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, or state-tribal education compact school subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW.(4) Enrollment stabilization amounts allocated under this section are not part of the state's program of basic education but may be used for any allowable cost within any of the programs.(5) This section expires July 1, 2028.--- END ---